Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Continuing Appropriations

47.010.
State revenue, to what funds credited.

Except as provided in this chapter and in KRS

342.480

, all state revenue shall be credited to the general fund.

All revenues realized from the gasoline tax imposed by KRS

138.220

or from any gasoline tax hereafter imposed by law, shall be credited to the state road fund.

All fees and taxes collected under the provisions of KRS Chapter 281, and all revenue realized from any motor bus license tax hereafter imposed by law, shall be credited to the state road fund.

All funds appropriated by law to revolving funds pursuant to the provisions of KRS

45.253

shall be credited to such revolving funds.

All funds collected under the provisions of KRS

278.120

to

278.150

for the support of the Public Service Commission shall be credited as provided in those sections.

History.

2739g-63, 2739j-44, 2739L-16, 4281g-3, 4281h-3, 4281w-1 to 4281w-3, 4356t-26: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 78, § 11(3); 1962, ch. 210, § 7; 1966, ch. 255, § 55; 1978, ch. 379, § 56, effective April 1, 1979; 1980, ch. 188, § 17, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 111, § 40, effective July 13, 1984.

47.011.
Coin machine tax revenue to be credited to general fund. [Repealed.]

47.012.
Pari-mutuel tax revenue to be credited to general fund.

All moneys paid to the Department of Revenue under the provisions of KRS

138.510

to

138.550

shall be deposited with the State Treasurer and be credited to the general expenditure fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 35, § 6; 2005, ch. 85, § 76, effective June 20, 2005.

47.020.
Motor truck registration fees, distribution among counties.

Thirty percent (30%) of all revenue raised by the tax imposed by subsections (3) through (14) of KRS

186.050

shall be evenly distributed among all the counties for the county road funds.

History.

2739g-2d, 4281w-3: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 59, § 2; 1966, ch. 139, § 1; 1974, ch. 68, § 1.

47.030.
Appropriation to Department of Revenue for enforcement of laws relating to alcoholic beverages. [Repealed.]

47.040.
Kentucky Aeronautics Commission; revolving fund. [Repealed.]

47.050.
Stockyard license fees; revolving fund. [Repealed.]

47.060.
Tobacco warehouse license fees; revolving fund. [Repealed.]

47.070.
Revolving fund for Division of Banking. [Repealed.]

47.080.
Fees and penalties under credit union law; how appropriated. [Repealed.]

47.090.
Fees for appointing railroad policemen; revolving fund. [Repealed.]

47.100.
Fees for appointing special local peace officers; revolving fund. [Repealed.]

47.110.
Percentage of tax on marriage licenses and conveyances to be distributed among counties.

Twelve and one-half percent (12.5%) of the revenue received from the taxes imposed by paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (1) of KRS

142.010

, shall be returned to the county in which the tax was paid and be credited to the general fund of the county.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 113, § 1.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Withholding from county’s share for cost of auditing, KRS

43.070

.

47.115.
Commonwealth’s attorneys’ expense account — Advancement of funds — Repayment — Disposition of surplus. [Repealed.]

47.120.
Judicial Expense Account. [Repealed.]

47.130.
Agency fund account for administration of securities law. [Repealed.]